Mississippi, session 2026, SB2387.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 25-34-41, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-34-41.  (1)  An individual qualified under subsection (2) may apply to the Secretary of State for a commission as a notary public.  The applicant must comply with and provide the information required by rules established by the Secretary of State and pay any application fee. (2)  An applicant for a commission as a notary public must: (a)  Be at least eighteen (18) years of age; (b)  Be a citizen or permanent legal resident of the United States; (c)  (i)  Be a resident of Mississippi for not less than thirty (30) days immediately preceding the date of the application; or (ii)  Be a resident of another state and reside within fifteen (15) miles of the border of Mississippi for not less than thirty (30) days immediately preceding the date of the application; (d)  Be able to read and write English; (e)  Not be disqualified to receive a commission under Section 25-34-43; and (f)  Meet such other requirements as the Secretary of State may establish by rule. (3)  Before issuance of a commission as a notary public, an applicant for the commission must execute the oath of office prescribed by Section 268 of the Constitution and submit it to the Secretary of State. (4)  Before issuance of a commission as a notary public, the applicant for a commission must submit to the Secretary of State an assurance in the form of a surety bond or its functional equivalent in the amount of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) pursuant to the rules set forth by the Secretary of State.  The assurance must be issued by a surety or other entity licensed by the Mississippi Department of Insurance.  The assurance must cover acts performed during the term of the notary public's commission and must be in the form prescribed by the Secretary of State.  If a notary public violates a law with respect to notaries public in this state, the surety or issuing entity is liable under the assurance.  The surety or issuing entity must give thirty (30) days' notice to the Secretary of State before canceling the assurance.  The surety or issuing entity must notify the Secretary of State not later than thirty (30) days after making a payment to a claimant under the assurance.  A notary public may perform notarial acts in this state only during the period that a valid assurance is on file with the Secretary of State. (5)  On compliance with this section, the Secretary of State shall issue a commission as a notary public to an applicant for a term of four (4) years. (6)  A commission to act as a notary public authorizes the notary public to perform notarial acts.  The commission does not provide the notary public any immunity or benefit conferred by the laws of this state on public officials or employees. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.